test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-istma86_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `istma2: # Verb (86/54) `istma2 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     istma+V+Inf/mA: istma
     istma+V+Inf: istuq
     istma+V+Act+PrfPrc: istnuq
     istma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [istut, istutu]

     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: istu
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [istut, istudõq]
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [ist, istus]
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: istumiq
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: istutiq
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [istvaq, istusõq]
     istma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: istu
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [istõ, istsõ, isti]
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [istõt, istsõt, istit, istõdõq, istsõdõq, istidõq, istõq, istsõq, istiq]
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [istõ, istsõ, ist́]
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [istõmiq, istsõmiq, istimiq]
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [istõtiq, istsõtiq, istitiq]
     istma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [istõq, istõvaq, istsõq, istsõvaq, istiq, istivaq]

     istma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: istutas

     istma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: istva

     istma+V+Jus: istkuq
